Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
In General
§ 81-18-13.
Authorization to collect and maintain records and process fees related to licensees; timing of grant or denial of request for license [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

In order to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of a completed application, final verification from the Department of Public Safety and/or FBI, and payment of licensing fees prescribed by this chapter, the department shall either grant or deny the request for license. However, if the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council (FFIEC) prescribes a lesser period of time within which the department shall either grant or deny the request for license, then that time limitation shall supersede this subsection.

A person shall not be indemnified for any act covered by this chapter or for any fine or penalty incurred under this chapter as a result of any violation of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter, due to the legal form, corporate structure, or choice of organization of the person, including, but not limited to, a limited liability corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 8; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 7; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-14.
Prelicensing education requirements; written test requirement [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

In order to meet the prelicensing education requirement referred to in Section 81-18-9(4) (d), a person shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations;

Three (3) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues;

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and

Four (4) hours of education related to the Mississippi S.A.F.E. Mortgage Act.

For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed, and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in subsection (1) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in Mississippi.

A person previously licensed under this chapter who applies to be licensed again on or after July 1, 2009, must prove that they have completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last held.

In order to meet the written test requirement for mortgage loan originators referred to in Section 81-18-9(4)(e), an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this subsection, a qualified written test developed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subsection (7) of this section unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

State law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions.

An individual may retake a test three (3) consecutive times with each consecutive taking occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test.

After failing three (3) consecutive tests, an individual shall wait at least six (6) months before taking the test again.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five (5) years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which such individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-15.
Mortgage broker, mortgage lender and mortgage loan originator license renewal procedures; license fees; annual continuing education requirements for mortgage loan originators [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Each mortgage broker and mortgage lender license shall remain in full force and effect until relinquished, suspended, revoked or expired. With each initial application for a license to operate as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender, the applicant shall pay through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to the commissioner a license fee of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00); however, if the initial mortgage broker or mortgage lender license is issued between November 1 and December 31, the license will expire December 31 of the following licensing year. Upon the expiration of the initial license, the licensee shall pay an annual renewal fee of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) on or before December 31 of each year. If the annual renewal fee remains unpaid, the license shall expire, but not before December 31 of any year for which the annual renewal fee has been paid. If the renewal fee is not paid before the expiration date of the license, then the licensee shall be liable for the initial license fee, which is One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), plus a penalty in an amount not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each day after the expiration of the license. All licensing fees and penalties shall be paid into the Consumer Finance Fund of the department. If the application is withdrawn or denied, the application fee along with any other applicable fee are not refundable.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance under Section 81-18-9(4).

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in Section 81-18-15(5).

The mortgage loan originator has paid all required fees for renewal of the license. Annual renewals of this license shall require a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

The license of a mortgage loan originator failing to satisfy the minimum standards for license renewal shall expire. The commissioner may adopt procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. If the renewal fee remains unpaid, the license shall expire, but not before December 31 of any year for which the annual renewal fee has been paid. However, if the initial loan originator license is issued between November 1 and December 31, the license will expire December 31 of the following licensing year. If the renewal fee is not paid before the expiration date of the license, the mortgage loan originator shall be liable for the initial license fee, which is Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), in order to renew.

Any licensee making timely and proper application for a license renewal shall be permitted to continue to operate under its existing license until its application is approved or rejected, but shall not be released from or otherwise indemnified for any act covered by this chapter or for any penalty incurred under this chapter as a result of any violation of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter, pending final approval or disapproval of the application for the license renewal.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements referred to in Section 81-18-15(2)(b), a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight (8) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations;

Two (2) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For the purposes of subsection (5) of this section, continuing education courses shall be reviewed, and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

Except for Section 81-18-15(3) and subsection (13) of this section, may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken; and

May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two (2) hours credit for every one (1) hour taught.

A person having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in subsection (5) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of continuing education requirements in Mississippi.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who later becomes unlicensed must complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

A person meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (c) of this section may make up any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule or regulation of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 9; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-17.
License nontransferable and nonassignable; notification to department of change in address, location, officers, etc.; department approval required for opening of branch office; notification to department of release of loan originator from employment; notification to department of change of qualifying individual of licensee [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

A license may not be transferred or assigned.

No licensee shall transact business under any name other than that designated in the license.

A licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall notify the department through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry of any change in the address of its principal place of business or of any change in the address of an additional licensed branch location within thirty (30) days of the change.

No licensee shall open a branch office in this state or a branch office outside this state from which the licensee has direct contact with consumers regarding origination or brokering Mississippi residential property, without prior approval of the department. An application for any branch office shall be made through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry on a form prescribed by the department, which shall include at least evidence of compliance with subsection (1) of Section 81-18-25 as to that branch and shall be accompanied by payment of a nonrefundable application fee of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) and at least one (1) loan originator application licensed at that branch office. The application shall be approved unless the department finds that the applicant has not conducted business under this chapter in accordance with law. Each branch office that currently holds a branch license shall renew that branch license before the expiration date of the main company license, on or before December 31; however, if the initial branch license is issued between November 1 and December 31, the license will expire December 31 of the following licensing year. The license renewal shall be on a form prescribed by the department with a nonrefundable renewal application fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). If the annual renewal fee remains unpaid, the license shall expire, but not before December 31 of any year for which the annual renewal fee has been paid. If the renewal fee is not paid before the expiration date of the license, the branch shall be liable for the initial license fee, which is Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), in order to renew.

A licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall notify the department within thirty (30) days by submitting a sponsorship removal in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry when a loan originator is released from its employment. In addition, the licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall notify the department within thirty (30) days through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry when there is a change of the qualifying individual of the licensee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 10; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 10; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-19.
Acquisition of interest in licensee [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire directly or indirectly ten percent (10%) or more of the voting shares of a corporation or ten percent (10%) or more of the ownership of any other entity licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless it first files an application in accordance with the requirements prescribed in Section 81-18-9.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the department shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it is satisfied and finds that the applicant and its members, if applicable, its directors and officers, if a corporation, and any proposed new directors and officers have provided its surety bond and have the character, reputation and experience to warrant belief that the business will be operated fairly and in accordance with the law. If the application is denied, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

A decision of the department denying a license, original or renewal, shall be conclusive, except that the applicant may seek judicial review in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

The provisions of this section do not apply to the following, subject to notification as required in this section:

The acquisition of an interest in a licensee directly or indirectly including an acquisition by merger or consolidation by or with a person licensed under this chapter or exempt from this chapter under Section 81-18-5.

The acquisition of an interest in a licensee directly or indirectly including an acquisition by merger or consolidation by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee.

The acquisition of an interest in a licensee by a person by bequest, devise, gift or survivorship or by operation of law.

A person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction that is requesting exemption from filing an application for approval of the application shall send a written request to the department for an exemption within thirty (30) days before the closing of the transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 11; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-21.
Maintenance and investigation of business records; biennial investigation; examination fee; department authorized to examine persons suspected of conducting business requiring a license; licensee to make records and books available to commissioner and compile reports; commissioner may control access to records of licensee under investigation [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Any person required to be licensed under this chapter shall maintain in its offices, or such other location as the department shall permit, the books, accounts and records necessary for the department to determine whether or not the person is complying with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the department under this chapter. These books, accounts and records shall be maintained apart and separate from any other business in which the person is involved and may represent historical data for three (3) years preceding the date of the last license application date forward. The books, accounts and records for individual consumer mortgage files shall be maintained apart and separate from any other personal loan files made by the same consumer. The books, accounts and records shall be kept in a secure location under conditions that will not lead to their damage or destruction. If the licensee wishes to keep the files in a location other than the location listed on the license, then the licensee first must submit a written request on a form designated by the department and gain written approval from the commissioner before storing the files at an off-site secure location.

To assure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, the department may examine the books and records of any licensee without notice during normal business hours. The commissioner shall charge the licensee an examination fee in an amount not less than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) nor more than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per day with a maximum examination fee of Two Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400.00) for each office or location within the State of Mississippi, and an examination fee in an amount not less than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) nor more than Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) per day for each office or location outside the State of Mississippi, plus any actual expenses incurred while examining the licensee’s records or books that are located outside the State of Mississippi. However, in no event shall a licensee be examined more than once in a two-year period unless for cause shown based upon consumer complaint and/or other exigent reasons as determined by the commissioner.

The department, its designated officers and employees, or its duly authorized representatives, for the purposes of discovering violations of this chapter and for the purpose of determining whether any person or individual reasonably suspected by the commissioner of conducting business that requires a license under this chapter, may investigate those persons and individuals and examine all relevant books, records and papers employed by those persons or individuals in the transaction of business, and may summon witnesses and examine them under oath concerning matters as to the business of those persons, or other such matters as may be relevant to the discovery of violations of this chapter, including, without limitation, the conduct of business without a license as required under this chapter.

Each licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter shall make available to the commissioner upon request the books and records relating to the operations of the licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter. The commissioner shall have access to those books and records and interview the officers, principals, mortgage loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter concerning their business. Failure to produce the books and records within sixty (60) days from the date of request may result in a violation of this chapter, resulting in a civil penalty.

Each licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to:

Accounting compilations;

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the commissioner; or

Such other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this chapter, the commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or investigation. The commissioner may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no individual or person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except under a court order or with the consent of the commissioner. Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the licensee have been or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this chapter, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.

The commissioner shall report regularly violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry subject to the provisions contained in Section 81-18-63.

Examinations and investigations conducted under this chapter and information obtained by the department, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, in the course of its duties under this chapter are confidential.

In the absence of malice, fraud or bad faith a person is not subject to civil liability arising from the filing of a complaint with the department, furnishing other information required by this chapter, information required by the department under the authority granted in this chapter, or information voluntarily given to the department related to allegations that a licensee or prospective licensee has violated this chapter. Failure of a person to respond to a formal complaint made with the department by a consumer may result in a violation of this chapter, resulting in a civil penalty.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the commissioner may:

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this state; or

Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the examination, report of investigation or other writing of the commissioner; or

Rely upon attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations; or

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations, including, but not limited to, joint enforcement action, by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information or evidence obtained under this section.

The authority of this section shall remain in effect, whether such a licensee, individual or person subject to this chapter acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state, or claims to act without that authority.

No licensee, individual or person subject to investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, falsify, abandon or secret any books, records, computer records or other information.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 12; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 12; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-23.
Annual written report by licensee [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Each mortgage licensee shall submit to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may require. Failure to file accurate, timely and complete reports on the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may result in a violation of this chapter, resulting in a civil penalty.

The department, in its discretion, may relieve any company from the payment of any penalty, in whole or in part, for good cause.

If a company fails to pay a penalty from which it has not been relieved, the department may maintain an action at law to recover the penalty.

Within fifteen (15) days of the occurrence of any of the following events, a company shall file with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry the applicable change in the disclosure questions and shall submit the information through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or file a written report with the commissioner describing the event and its expected impact on the activities of the company in this state:

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the company;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the company by any state or governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the company or any of its directors, executive officers, qualifying individual or loan originators;

Any felony conviction of the company or any of its directors, executive officers, qualifying individual or loan originators;

Expiration, termination or default, technical or otherwise, of any existing line of credit or warehouse credit agreement;

Suspension or termination of the licensee’s status as an approved seller or seller/servicer by the Federal National Mortgage Association, Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation or Government National Mortgage Association;

Exercise of recourse rights by investors or subsequent assignees of mortgage loans if such loans, in the aggregate, exceed the licensee’s net worth exclusive of real property and fixed assets; or

Existence of negative balances, exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in any operation account at any time or the return of checks, exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for insufficient funds.

Licensees who are involved in civil actions shall notify the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within sixty (60) days of the occurrence. An explanation and supporting documentation for each civil action concerning the company shall be submitted through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The department may require additional information as necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 13; Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 7; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 13; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-25.
Requirements for principal place of business and branch offices [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Each principal place of business and branch office in the state shall meet all of the following requirements:

Be in compliance with local zoning ordinances and have posted any licenses required by local government agencies. It is the responsibility of the licensee to meet local zoning ordinances and obtain the required occupational licenses; however, zoning cannot be residential. If there is no zoning in the area, then the person shall submit to the department a letter from the city or county stating that there is no zoning.

Consist of at least one (1) secure enclosed room or secure building of stationary construction in which negotiations of mortgage loan transactions may be conducted in privacy. Stationary construction does not include the use of portable buildings. If there is no zoning in the requested location and the property is used for residential purposes, then the person shall utilize an enclosed room with a dedicated outside door.

Display a permanent sign outside the place of business readily visible to the general public, unless the display of sign violates local zoning ordinances or restrictive covenants. The sign must contain the name of the licensee and shall also contain the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry Unique Identifier issued to that particular licensed location.

If one (1) of the following is correct, then that location shall be licensed as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender under this chapter and not as a branch:

It is a separate entity operating as an independent business or mortgage operation which is not under the direct control, management supervision and responsibility of the licensee;

The licensee is not the lessee or owner of the branch and the branch is not under the direct and daily ownership, control, management and supervision of the licensee;

All assets and liabilities of the branch are not assets and liabilities of the licensee, and all income and expenses of the branch are income and expenses of the licensee and properly accounted for in the financial records and tax returns of the licensee; or

All practices, policies and procedures, including, but not limited to, those relating to employment and operations, are not originated and established by the licensee or registered company and are not applied consistently to the principal place of business and all branches.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall affect or change, or be construed as affecting or changing, the existing statutory law and common law on agency, principal and agent, independent contractors, and parent and subsidiary companies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 14; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 14; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 14; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 15; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 14; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2016.